Ohio, session 136, HB218.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 4301.13 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 4301.13. (A) The liquor control commission may adopt, promulgate, repeal, rescind, and amend rules to regulate the manner of dealing in and distributing and selling bottled wine within the state. The commission may require out-of-state producers, shippers, bottlers, and holders of federal importers' permits shipping bottled wine into Ohio and holders of A-2, A-2f, B-5, B-3, and B-2 permits issued by the division of liquor control, engaged in distributing and selling bottled wine in Ohio, to file with the division a schedule of prices in which minimum prices are set forth for the sale of bottled wine at wholesale or retail, or both, in Ohio. Any amendments, additions, alterations, or revisions to the schedule of prices as originally filed with the division shall be filed in the same manner as the original schedule of prices required to be filed with the division. (B)(1) As used in division (B)(2) of this section: (a) "Case" means not less than six and not more than twelve bottles of wine, which need not be of the same brand, variety, or volume. (b) "Dealcoholized beverage" means wine that has been processed to remove its alcohol so that the beverage contains less than one-half of one per cent of alcohol by volume. (2) The commission may determine and fix the minimum mark-ups at wholesale or retail, or both, for bottled wine, and fix the minimum prices at which the various classes of bottled wine shall be distributed and sold in Ohio either at wholesale or retail, or both. With regard to the minimum prices at which various classes of bottled wine are sold in the state at retail, the commission shall allow a retail permit holder to offer to a personal consumer a ten per cent discount off the per-bottle retail sale price on each bottle included in a case of that wine that is offered for sale. (2) As used in division (B)(1) of this section, "case" means not less than six and not more than twelve bottles of wine, which need not be of the same brand, variety, or volumeIn conjunction with the discount on a case of wine, the commission shall allow a retail permit holder to offer a ten per cent discount off the per-bottle retail sale price on each bottle of dealcoholized beverage that is offered for sale if the person purchases the dealcoholized beverage as part of the same transaction in which the person purchases a case of wine. Section 2. That existing section 4301.13 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.